District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.153

Marriage equality estate tax clarification.

The Chief Financial Officer is directed to make the clarifying changes to all estate tax forms, filing instructions, and regulations necessary to make it clear that all married couples are eligible for estate tax deductions and exclusions, including the spousal exclusion of bequests, whether direct or through trusts, to a surviving spouse, regardless of whether such marriage is recognized under federal law.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7282, 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7282 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7282 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7281 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle BB of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Marriage Equality Estate Tax Clarification Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.